Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall assemble and keep in the offices of the cabinet information
relating to natural resources, industrial sites, labor supply, water, fuel, power, wage
rates, taxation and assessments, transportation and communication facilities,
Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy programs, including any programs
established in KRS 246.605 and 247.944, and any other information that may be
useful in executing the provisions of KRS 154.12-210 to 154.12-212. This
information shall be made available to any enterprise which, in the discretion of the
secretary, is legitimate and which contemplates location or operation within the
Commonwealth. The information shall, in the discretion of the secretary, be made
available to any governmental or private agency interested in securing the location
or operation of any legitimate enterprise within the Commonwealth.
(2) The cabinet shall obtain from enterprises interested in locating and operating within
the Commonwealth information relating to the nature of the enterprise, its financial
responsibility, manpower requirements, probable consumption of raw materials,
and any other information that may be useful in securing the location of such
enterprise in the Commonwealth.
(3) The cabinet shall be the primary industrial and commercial development agency of
the Commonwealth of Kentucky in matters relating to the private sector of the
state's economy. The cabinet shall carry out programs relating to industrial and
commercial development, research and planning, community and industrial
services, marketing development, small and minority business enterprise,
international trade and reverse investment, and other programs designated by the
board.
Section 2. KRS 154.12-213 is amended to read as follows:
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 987
(1) The cabinet, as it deems necessary and advisable, may:
(a) Consult with agencies of the state, federal, and local government in order to
coordinate development programs and plans and to articulate agriculture,
industry, and commerce in the light of the needs of particular localities;
(b) Make studies of land utilization so as to determine areas suitable for industrial
and commercial development;
(c) Make studies and projections and publish information relating to the
economic development of the Commonwealth and make appropriate
recommendations to the board and the General Assembly;
(d) Establish and maintain development offices in out-of-state centers of
industrial and commercial management; and
(e) Place advertising in appropriate media promoting Kentucky's resources and
locational advantages for industrial and commercial enterprises.
(2) The cabinet shall coordinate with and seek guidance from the Commissioner of
Agriculture in considering any projects for economic incentives related to
agricultural economic development, agribusiness, or production facilities for
alternative fuels including sustainable aviation fuels, including providing to the
Commissioner of Agriculture:
(a) Names of applicants;
(b) Details of proposed projects, including the proposed activity and the location
of the proposed activity;
(c) Estimates of capital investment and jobs to be created; and
(d) Any other information requested by the Commissioner of Agriculture.
(3) The cabinet shall promote the programs of the Kentucky Office of Agricultural
Policy, including any programs established in KRS 246.605 and 247.944, to any
applicants seeking to participate in any economic incentive programs established
in this chapter upon the:
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 987
(a) Time of the initial communication;
(b) Submission of an application for economic incentives; and
(c) Acceptance of any economic incentives awarded under this chapter.
(4) Beginning on August 1, 2026, and the first day of each month thereafter the
cabinet shall submit a report to the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy and to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Appropriations and Revenue or to the House Standing Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the Senate Standing Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue when the General Assembly is in session. The
monthly report shall include:
(a) The number of applications submitted for each program executed under the
provisions of this chapter;
(b) The number of applicants that were provided information about Kentucky
Office of Agricultural Policy programs as established in KRS 246.605 and
247.944;
(c) The project code or identifier used to track the project application
throughout the review process;
(d) The name of any incentive or funding program for which the project
application is seeking consideration under the provisions of this chapter;
(e) The total project amount and the total amount of incentives or program
funds requested by each project application;
(f) The initial communication date, detailing how and when the project
applicant established initial contact with the cabinet;
(g) The date of any formal project application submitted to the cabinet for
consideration of any program established in this chapter;
(h) The approval status for each submitted project application, detailing
whether the project application was approved, denied, withdrawn, or
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 987
remains pending, along with an explanation as to why that determination
was made;
(i) The total amount of incentives or funding awarded to any project
application; and
(j) Any additional monthly reporting requirements as deemed appropriate by
the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy.
Section 3. KRS 154.20-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created and established within the cabinet, subject to the authority of the
board, the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority as an agency,
instrumentality, and political subdivision of the Commonwealth and a public body
corporate and politic with all powers, duties, and responsibilities delegated to it by
the board or as otherwise provided by law, including all programs, powers, duties,
rights, and obligations of the Kentucky Development Finance Authority and the
Kentucky Rural Economic Development Authority.
(2) Any interest, right, or cause of action held in whole or in part by any person,
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, government
agency, or other entity under any agreement, contract, lease, mortgage, guarantee,
bond, note, refund bond, or other financial transaction or obligation, made, issued,
or otherwise entered into by any of the authorities, programs, or funds specified in
subsection (1) of this section or that may be delegated to the authority by the board,
shall not be impaired or otherwise diminished.
(3) Any interest, right, or cause of action held in whole or in part by any of the
authorities, programs, or funds specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not
be impaired or otherwise diminished, but shall be assumed by the authority, for and
on behalf of the cabinet.
(4) The authority shall consist of a committee of eight (8)[seven (7)] persons, including
six (6) persons appointed by the board who shall be private citizens of the
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 987
Commonwealth, the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Agricultural
Policy who shall serve ex officio, and the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet who shall serve ex officio. Any person appointed to the
committee shall have experience and expertise in business or finance, and at least
one (1) appointee shall have experience and expertise in agriculture.
(5) Two (2) members initially appointed to the committee shall have a term of one (1)
year each, two (2) members initially appointed to the committee shall have a term
of two (2) years each, and two (2) members initially appointed to the committee
shall have a term of three (3) years each, except that any person appointed to fill a
vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term. All subsequent
appointments shall be for a term of three (3) years.
(6) Any person appointed to the committee shall be eligible for reappointment,
including any member of the committee appointed prior to July 15, 1994.
(7) The members of the committee shall elect biennially from the committee's private
citizen membership the following officers: chairman, vice chairman, secretary-
treasurer, and any assistant secretaries and assistant treasurers the committee deems
necessary.
(8) A majority of the members of the committee, determined by excluding any existing
vacancies from the total number of members, shall constitute a quorum. A majority
vote of the members present at a duly called meeting of the committee shall be
required for the purposes of conducting its business and exercising its powers and
for all other purposes.
(9) The committee shall prepare bylaws and procedures applicable to the operations of
the authority and submit them to the board to be promulgated as administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(10) Members of the committee shall be entitled to compensation for their services in an
amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each regular meeting of the committee
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 987
and shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses in connection with
the performance of their duties.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 10/10/2025 9:05 AM Jacketed